tr: Dahil olan dikiş seti bileşenleri: Masuralar; Düğmeler; Kopçalar; Ütüyle yapışan yamalar; Mezura; İplik geçirici; İğneler; İğnelik; Toplu iğneler; Çengelli iğneler; Makaslar; Dikiş ölçer; Dikiş sökücü; Saklama kutusu; Düz cetvel; Terzi taşı/kumaş kalemi; Yüksük; İplik makası; İplik makaraları; Fermuarlar; Diğer
pt-PT: Componentes do kit de costura incluídos: Bobinas; Botões; Colchetes; Remendos termocolantes; Fita métrica; Enfiador de agulhas; Agulhas; Almofada de alfinetes; Alfinetes; Alfinetes de ama; Tesouras; Medidor de bainhas; Descosedor; Estojo de arrumação; Régua reta; Giz de alfaiate/marcador de tecido; Dedal; Corta-fios; Carrinhos de linha; Fechos de correr; Outro
sk-SK: Komponenty súpravy na šitie v cene: Cievky; Gombíky; Háčiky a očká; Nažehľovacie záplaty; Krajčírsky meter; Navliekač ihiel; Ihly; Ihelníček; Špendlíky; Zatváracie špendlíky; Nožnice; Mierka na švy; Párač švov; Úložné puzdro; Rovné pravítko; Krajčírska krieda/fixka na textil; Náprstok; Cvakacie nožnice na nite; Cievky nití; Zipsy; Iné
fi: Ompelupakkauksen sisältämät komponentit: Puolat; Napit; Hakaset; Silitettävät paikat; Mittanauha; Neulanlangoitin; Neulat; Neulatyyny; Nuppineulat; Hakaneulat; Sakset; Saumamitta; Ratkoja; Säilytyskotelo; Viivoitin; Vaatturinkriitu/kangasmerkkauskynä; Sormustin; Lankasakset; Lankarullat; Vetoketjut; Muu
vi: Các dụng cụ đi kèm trong bộ đồ may vá: Suốt chỉ; Cúc áo; Móc và khoen; Miếng vá ủi; Thước dây; Dụng cụ xỏ chỉ; Kim khâu; Gối cắm kim; Ghim; Kim băng; Kéo; Thước đo đường may; Dụng cụ rọc chỉ; Hộp đựng; Thước thẳng; Phấn may/bút kẻ vải; Đê bảo vệ ngón tay; Kéo cắt chỉ; Cuộn chỉ; Khóa kéo; Khác
nb: Inkluderte komponenter i sysett: Spoler; Knapper; Hemper og kroker; Strykelapper; Målebånd; Nålitreder; Nåler; Nålpute; Knappenåler; Sikkerhetsnåler; Saks; Sømmåler; Sprettekniv; Oppbevaringsboks; Linjal; Skredderkritt/stofftusj; Fingerbøl; Trådsaks; Trådsneller; Glidelåser; Annet
hu: Tartozék varrókészlet komponensek: Orsók; Gombok; Kapcsok és szemek; Vasalható foltok; Mérőszalag; Tűbefűző; Tűk; Tűpárna; Gombostűk; Biztosítótűk; Olló; Varratvonalzó; Varratbontó; Tárolódoboz; Egyenes vonalzó; Szabókréta / Textiljelölő; Gyűszű; Cérnavágó; Cérnaorsók; Cipzárak; Egyéb
bg-BG: Включени компоненти в шивашки комплект: Калерчета; Копчета; Кукички и илици; Лепящи се с ютия кръпки; Сантиметър; Вдевачка; Игли; Игленик; Карфици; Безопасни игли; Ножици; Линийка за шев; Разпорвач на шевове; Кутия за съхранение; Права линийка; Кредà/маркер за плат; Напръстник; Ножичка за конци; Макари с конци; Ципове; Друго
zh-CN: 包括缝纫套件组件: 梭芯; 纽扣; 风纪扣; 熨烫贴; 软尺; 穿线器; 缝纫针; 针插; 大头针; 安全别针; 剪刀; 缝份尺; 拆线刀; 收纳盒; 直尺; 裁缝粉笔/布用记号笔; 顶针; 纱剪; 线轴; 拉链; 其他
el: Περιλαμβάνονται προϊόντα κιτ ραπτικής: Μασούρια; Κουμπιά; Κόπιτσες; Σιδερότυπα μπαλώματα; Μεζούρα; Περαστήρι κλωστής; Βελόνες; Πελότα; Καρφίτσες; Παραμάνες; Ψαλίδι; Χάρακας ραπτικής; Ξηλωτήρι; Θήκη αποθήκευσης; Ίσιος χάρακας; Κιμωλία ραπτικής/μαρκαδόρος υφάσματος; Δαχτυλήθρα; Ψαλιδάκι κλωστών; Κουβαρίστρες; Φερμουάρ; Άλλο
ro-RO: Componente incluse în trusa de cusut: Bobine; Nasturi; Moș și babă; Petice termoadezive; Centimetru de croitorie; Înfilator de ac; Ace; Perniță pentru ace; Ace cu gămălie; Ace de siguranță; Foarfeci; Liniar pentru tiv; Desfăcător de cusături; Cutie de depozitare; Riglă dreaptă; Cretă de croitorie/marker pentru materiale textile; Degetar; Forfecuțe pentru ațe; Bobine de ață; Fermoare; Altele
sv: Komponenter som ingår i syset: Spolar; Knappar; Hyskor och hakar; Stryk-på-lappar; Måttband; Nålträdare; Nålar; Nåldyna; Knappnålar; Säkerhetsnålar; Saxar; Sömmätare; Sprättare; Förvaringsväska; Rak linjal; Skräddarkrita/textilpenna; Fingerborg; Trådsax; Trådrullar; Dragkedjor; Övrigt
it: Componenti del kit da cucito inclusi: Spoline; Bottoni; Gancetti e occhielli; Toppe termoadesive; Metro a nastro; Infila aghi; Aghi; Puntaspilli; Spilli; Spille da balia; Forbici; Calibro per cucitura; Scucitore; Custodia; Righello dritto; Gesso da sarto/Marcatore per tessuti; Ditale; Forbici tagliafili; Rocchetti di filo; Cerniere; Altro
ja: ソーイングキットコンポーネント付き: ボビン; ボタン; ホック; アイロンワッペン; メジャー; 糸通し; 針; ピンクッション; マチ針; 安全ピン; はさみ; シームゲージ; リッパー; 収納ケース; 定規; チャコペンシル/ファブリックマーカー; 指ぬき; 糸切りばさみ; 糸巻き; ファスナー; その他
ko: 바느질 키트 구성품 포함: 보빈; 버튼; 훅 앤 아이; 다리미용 패치; 줄자; 실 꿰기; 바늘; 핀 쿠션; 핀; 옷핀; 가위; 시접자; 실뜯개; 보관 케이스; 직선 자; 초크/초크펜; 골무; 쪽가위; 실패; 지퍼; 기타
hr-HR: Uključene komponente seta za šivanje: Špulice; Gumbi; Kukice i očice; Zakrpe na glačanje; Krojački metar; Uvlačilo konca u iglu; Igle; Jastučić za igle; Pribadače; Sigurnosne igle; Škare; Mjerilo za šavove; Paralica; Kutija za pohranu; Ravnalo; Krojačka kreda / marker za tkaninu; Naprstak; Škarice za konac; Kalemi konca; Patentni zatvarači; Ostalo
nl: Inbegrepen naaibenodigdheden: Spoelen; Knopen; Haken en ogen; Strijkpatches; Meetlint; Draaddoorsteker; Naalden; Speldenkussen; Spelden; Veiligheidsspelden; Schaar; Zoommaatje; Tornmesje; Opbergdoos; Rechte liniaal; Kleermakerskrijt/stofstift; Vingerhoed; Draadknipper; Garenklossen; Ritsen; Overig
cs: Komponenty obsažené v šicí sadě: Cívky; Knoflíky; Háčky a očka; Nažehlovací záplaty; Krejčovský metr; Navlékač jehel; Jehly; Jehelníček; Špendlíky; Zavírací špendlíky; Nůžky; Měřidlo švů; Páráček; Úložné pouzdro; Pravítko; Krejčovská křída / fix na textil; Náprstek; Cvakačky na nitě; Cívky s nitěmi; Zipy; Jiné
zh-TW: 包含縫紉套件組件: 梭芯; 鈕扣; 鉤眼扣; 熨燙補丁; 測量捲尺; 穿線器; 縫衣針; 針插; 大頭針; 安全別針; 剪刀; 縫份尺; 拆線刀; 收納盒; 直尺; 裁縫粉筆/布料標記筆; 頂針; 紗剪; 線軸; 拉鍊; 其他
fr: Composants du kit de couture inclus: Canettes; Boutons; Agrafes et œillets; Écussons thermocollants; Ruban à mesurer; Enfile-aiguille; Aiguilles; Pelote à épingles; Épingles; Épingles à nourrice; Ciseaux; Jauge de couture; Découseur; Boîte de rangement; Règle droite; Craie de tailleur/marqueur pour tissu; Dé à coudre; Coupe-fil; Bobines de fil; Fermetures éclair; Autre
es: Componentes incluidos en el kit de limpieza: Bobinas; Botones; Ganchos y ojales; Parches termoadhesivos; Cinta métrica; Enhebrador de agujas; Agujas; Alfiletero; Alfileres; Imperdibles; Tijeras; Calibrador de costura; Descosedor; Estuche de almacenamiento; Regla recta; Tiza de sastre/marcador de tela; Dedal; Cortahilos; Carretes de hilo; Cremalleras; Otro
pt-BR: Componentes incluídos no kit de costura: Bobinas; Botões; Colchetes; Remendos termocolantes; Fita métrica; Passador de linha; Agulhas; Almofada de alfinetes; Alfinetes; Alfinetes de segurança; Tesouras; Medidor de costura; Abridor de casas (descosedor); Estojo de armazenamento; Régua reta; Giz de alfaiate/marcador de tecido; Dedal; Tesoura de arremate; Carretéis de linha; Zíperes; Outros
de: Im Nähset enthaltene Artikel: Spulen; Knöpfe; Haken & Ösen; Aufbügelflicken; Maßband; Nadeleinfädler; Nadeln; Nadelkissen; Stecknadeln; Sicherheitsnadeln; Schere; Handmaß; Nahttrenner; Aufbewahrungsbox; Gerades Lineal; Schneiderkreide/Textilmarker; Fingerhut; Fadenschere; Garnrollen; Reißverschlüsse; Andere
lt-LT: Į siuvimo rinkinį įeinantys komponentai: Ritės; Sagos; Kabliukai ir kilpelės; Užlyginami lopai; Matavimo juosta; Siūlo įvėrėjas; Adatos; Adatinė; Smeigtukai; Žiogeliai; Žirklės; Siūlių matuoklis; Siūlių ardiklis; Laikymo dėklas; Tiesi liniuotė; Siuvėjo kreida / audinių žymeklis; Antpirštis; Siūlų kirpiklis; Siūlų ritės; Užtrauktukai; Kita
sl-SI: Vključene komponente v šivalnem kompletu: Vretena; Gumbi; Kaveljčki in ušesca; Zaplate za likanje; Merilni trak; Vdevalec niti; Igle; Blazinica za bucike; Bucike; Varnostne sponke; Škarje; Merilo za šive; Paralica; Kovček za shranjevanje; Ravno ravnilo; Kreda/flomaster za tkanine; Naprstnik; Škarjice za sukance; Sukanci; Zadrge; Drugo
en: Sewing kit components included: Bobbins; Buttons; Hooks & eyes; Iron-on patches; Measuring tape; Needle threader; Needles; Pin cushion; Pins; Safety pins; Scissors; Seam gauge; Seam ripper; Storage case; Straight ruler; Tailor's chalk/fabric marker; Thimble; Thread snips; Thread spools; Zippers; Other
th: ส่วนประกอบของชุดเย็บผ้า: ไส้กระสวย; กระดุม; ตะขอและห่วง; แผ่นรีดติด; สายวัด; ที่สนเข็ม; เข็ม; หมอนปักเข็ม; เข็มหมุด; เข็มกลัด; กรรไกร; ไม้บรรทัดวัดตะเข็บ; ที่เลาะด้าย; กล่องเก็บ; ไม้บรรทัดตรง; ชอล์กเขียนผ้า/ปากกาเขียนผ้า; ปลอกนิ้ว; กรรไกรขลิบด้าย; หลอดด้าย; ซิป; อื่นๆ
pl: Dołączono elementy zestawu do szycia: Szpulki; Guziki; Haftki; Łaty termonaprasowywalne; Miarka krawiecka; Nawlekacz do igieł; Igły; Poduszka na igły; Szpilki; Agrafki; Nożyczki; Wzornik szwów; Prujka; Pudełko do przechowywania; Linijka; Kreda krawiecka / marker do tkanin; Naparstek; Obcinaczki do nitek; Szpulki nici; Zamki błyskawiczne; Inne
da: Medfølgende komponenter i sysæt: Spoler; Knapper; Hægter og maller; Strygemærker; Målebånd; Nåletræder; Nåle; Nålepude; Knappenåle; Sikkerhedsnåle; Saks; Sømmåler; Opsprætter; Opbevaringskasse; Lige lineal; Skrædderkridt/stofmarkør; Fingerbøl; Trådsaks; Trådruller; Lynlåse; Andet
ru: Состав швейного набора: Шпульки; Пуговицы; Крючки и петли; Термозаплатки; Сантиметровая лента; Нитковдеватель; Иглы; Игольница; Булавки; Английские булавки; Ножницы; Линейка для припусков; Вспарыватель; Футляр для хранения; Прямая линейка; Портновский мел/маркер для ткани; Наперсток; Кусачки для ниток; Катушки ниток; Молнии; Другое